California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

9674.

An agreement which is entered into pursuant to Section 9672 shall provide for the disposition, division, or distribution of any property which is acquired as the result of the joint exercise of powers, and the return of any surplus moneys, in proportion to the contributions which were made, after the agreement has been completed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Violations [9691. - 9702.]

9691.

It is unlawful for any person to remove or cause to be removed any animal from any district, area, or premises which is quarantined pursuant to this chapter, except upon the conditions which are prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9692.

It is unlawful for any person to bring or cause to be brought any animal into a quarantined district, area, or premises, without written permission from the State Veterinarian or an authorized representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9693.

It is unlawful for any person to move or cause to be moved any animal from place to place within any quarantined district, area, or premises, without written permission from the State Veterinarian or an authorized representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9694.

It is unlawful for any person to resist the destruction of any animal or property ordered destroyed by the State Veterinarian pursuant to Section 9562.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9695.

It is unlawful for any person to hide, secrete, or fail to disclose any animal or property that is suffering from, or that has been exposed or potentially exposed to any disease subject to a current quarantine order or to fail to disclose the whereabouts of that animal or property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9696.

It is unlawful for any person to fail or refuse to dispose of any property destroyed pursuant to Section 9562 or 9569 in the manner prescribed by the State Veterinarian, when directed or required to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9697.

It is unlawful for any person to fail or refuse to clean or disinfect any premises in the manner prescribed by the State Veterinarian, when directed to do so by the State Veterinarian pursuant to Section 9562 or 9569.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9698.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any quarantine order which regulates, restricts, or restrains the movement of persons, vehicles, farm equipment, farm and dairy products into, from, or from place to place within a quarantined district, area, or premises.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9699.

It is unlawful for any person to violate the conditions of any permit which authorizes the permittee to travel upon any road or highway within a quarantined district, area, or premises.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9700.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any other provision of this chapter or any regulation or order which is made pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9701.

Any violation of any provision of this chapter is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense and is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment, for a second or subsequent offense committed within three years of a prior conviction under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9702.

It is unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to fail to stop the vehicle upon demand of a clearly identified animal health quarantine officer when the officer orders the operator to stop for the purpose of determining whether any quarantine which is established pursuant to this chapter is being violated and the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the vehicle is being used in connection with a quarantine violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 539, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. DISEASED BOVINES [9801. - 10610.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exceptions [9801. - 9801.]

9801.

This part does not apply to animals which are used in research projects of the University of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bovine Tuberculosis [9901. - 10152.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [9901. - 9914.]

9901.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9902.

“Accredited herd” means a herd of cattle for which the owner holds a valid certificate of accreditation issued to him by the United States Department of Agriculture and the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9903.

“Approved veterinarian” means a veterinarian who has been granted permission by the department to buy, possess, or use tuberculin.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9904.

“Bovine animals” means cattle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9907.

“State TB status” means an area so declared by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 5.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9908.

“Premises” means any place where cattle have been or are kept.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9909.

“Purebred animal” means an animal which is identified in the herd book of a breed record association that is recognized by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9910.

“Reactor” or “reacting bovine animal” means any bovine animal that reacts positively to a tuberculosis test or that is determined to be tuberculosis upon examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 6.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9912.

“Tuberculosis test” means the use of an official test for diagnosing tuberculosis in cattle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 8.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9913.

“Tuberculosis control area” means an area which is established and delimited as such by proclamation of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9914.

“Tuberculosis-exposed cattle” means cattle that have been in contact with, or exposed to, any reactor or tuberculosis infected premises, or any tuberculosis infected material.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 9.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [9931. - 9933.]

9931.

To carry out the provisions of this chapter, the inspectors or agents of the department or the United States Department of Agriculture, may at any time or place, enter upon any premises, except dwelling houses. No person shall obstruct, hamper, or interfere with the agents or inspectors while they are enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9932.

The State Veterinarian may make regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter to prevent bovine tuberculosis from entering and spreading within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 10.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9933.

The department may enter into any cooperative agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture to undertake tuberculosis control pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 11.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale and Use of Tuberculosis Tests [9941. - 9944.]

9941.

(a) The State Veterinarian may designate approved veterinarians to buy, possess, or use tuberculosis tests and may suspend or revoke that designation.

(b) The State Veterinarian may designate a duly authorized representative of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture to possess or use tuberculosis tests and may suspend or revoke that designation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 13.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9942.

Any sale or disposition of tuberculosis tests within the state shall be reported to the department within five days after the sale or disposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 14.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9943.

(a) It is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 90 days, without alternative of a fine in any case, for any person who is not an approved veterinarian to buy, possess, or use tuberculosis tests.

(b) It is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than 90 days, without alternative of a fine in any case, for any person who is not a duly authorized representative of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture to possess or use tuberculosis tests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 15.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9944.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or otherwise dispose of any tuberculosis test in the state that has not been produced under license of the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 16.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Tuberculosis Tests [9971. - 9982.]

9971.

Any approved veterinarian or duly authorized representative of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture may ear tag or otherwise identify any bovine animal to establish the identity of the animal, while applying a tuberculosis test to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 18.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9972.

The result of every tuberculosis test shall be reported to the State Veterinarian by the veterinarian who conducted the test within 48 hours after the completion of the test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 19.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9973.

Every reactor, immediately upon the determination of such reaction, shall be identified, pursuant to regulations of the department and the United States Department of Agriculture, by its owner or the owner’s agent under the supervision of the approved veterinarian who conducts the tuberculosis test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 20.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9974.

If the State Veterinarian has reason to suspect an irregularity in the application of a tuberculosis test or the identification of reactors, the State Veterinarian may enter any premises for the purpose of examining any bovine animals in or on the premises to determine if there has been any abuse or misuse of tuberculosis, or any faulty, unskillful, or irregular technique or procedure in the application of the tuberculosis test, identification of reactors, or identification of animals tested for tuberculosis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 21.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9975.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Obstruct, attack, or interfere with, or permit to be obstructed, attacked, or interfered with, the State Veterinarian or an approved veterinarian who is conducting a tuberculosis test.

(b) Neglect or fail to properly secure and restrain any bovine animal to be tuberculosis tested, or under tuberculosis test, for examination, injection, observation, or other procedures that pertain to a tuberculosis test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 22.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9976.

It is a misdemeanor which is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 90 days, without the alternative of a fine in any case, for any person to defeat or interfere with or to attempt to defeat or interfere with a tuberculosis test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 23.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9977.

It is a misdemeanor which is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 90 days, without the alternative of a fine in any case, for any person to obstruct, defeat, or interfere with or to attempt to obstruct, defeat, or interfere with a tuberculosis test by transporting from a premises or by hiding away or sequestering any bovine animal from or by bringing substitute bovine animals onto, such premises after receipt of a notification by the owner or person in charge of such animals on the premises from the department or from an approved veterinarian who is conducting tuberculosis tests, stating that the animals or herd on such premises will be tuberculosis tested on or before a certain date or will be under tuberculosis test for a stated period and that the animals or herd shall be held on the stated premises for a specified period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 24.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9978.

Permission in writing may be obtained from the department or the approved veterinarian who is conducting the tuberculosis tests to allow any necessary movement of the animals required to be held pursuant to Section 9977. Upon the completion of the tuberculosis test that is referred to in the notification, the department or the approved veterinarian shall issue a written release from the holding requirements of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 25.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9979.

It is unlawful for any person to apply a tuberculosis test to any bovine animal that has at any time been found by an approved veterinarian to be a reactor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 26.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9980.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly apply tuberculosis tests that are not approved tests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 27.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9981.

It is unlawful for any person to have any tuberculosis infected or exposed bovine animal at any livestock fair or show.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 28.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9982.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly sell, after notification of its condition from the department, any bovine animal that has tuberculosis as shown by a positive reaction to the tuberculosis test, physical examination, or any other method which is recognized by the department, unless the person has first obtained a permit in writing from the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 29.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Tuberculosis Control Areas [10001. - 10007.]

10001.

The department may establish and maintain tuberculosis control areas within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

When the department establishes a tuberculosis control area, the affected industry shall be notified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 31.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

The State Veterinarian may authorize the testing of any cattle in a tuberculosis control area to determine which animals are affected with tuberculosis.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 33.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

All owners of cattle within a tuberculosis control area that are subject to examination and tuberculosis testing shall, upon request of the department, provide necessary facilities for conducting tuberculosis tests, and render such assistance as may be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 35.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

Cattle moving into a tuberculosis control area must meet the requirements specified by the State Veterinarian.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 37.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Slaughter of Reacting Bovine Animals [10061. - 10071.]

10061.

The State Veterinarian may impose a quarantine pursuant to Section 9562 when any bovine animal reacts positively to a tuberculosis test conducted by an approved veterinarian or a duly authorized representative of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture, or determined to be tuberculous upon physical examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 41.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10062.

The value of the reacting bovine animal for which indemnity is paid shall be determined in accordance with the provisions in Sections 9592 and 9593.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 42.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10063.

Within 30 days after the appraisal of the reacting bovine animal, it shall be slaughtered under the supervision of the State Veterinarian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 43.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10064.

Animals shall be tested or slaughtered pursuant to this article even if indemnity funds are unavailable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 44.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10065.

The slaughtering of any reacting bovine animal, pursuant to this article, shall be under the supervision of the department, or of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 45.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10066.

The carcasses of the slaughtered animals shall be disposed of pursuant to the regulations of the department or the rules and regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture that govern meat inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 46.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10067.

If an animal is slaughtered pursuant to this article, and indemnity funds are available, the owner may receive part or all of the following:

(a) The proceeds of the sale of the salvage of the animal.

(b) From the United States Department of Agriculture, any sum that is authorized to be paid to the owner from any appropriation that is made by the United States Department of Agriculture to assist in the eradication of tuberculosis in cattle in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 47.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10068.

Indemnity provided by this article shall not be paid to any person in any of the following cases:

(a) For any bovine animal that is brought into a tuberculosis control area that reacts to a tuberculosis test that is applied within 90 days after arrival of the animal in the area, as provided for in this chapter.

(b) For any bovine animal that is brought into a tuberculosis control area in violation of any law, any regulation of the department, or any rule or regulation of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(c) For any reacting bovine animal, until the premises, where the animal had been kept, have been cleaned and disinfected by the owner in a manner that is approved by an agent of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(d) For any reacting bovine animal that is not slaughtered within 30 days after the animal is appraised.

(e) For any animal that is owned by a federal, state, or local government entity.

(f) If the person has violated any provision of this chapter that relates to a tuberculosis control area or any regulation that is made by the department that relates to such an area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 48.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10069.

A subsequent payment of indemnity shall not be made to any person in any of the following cases:

(a) Unless the provisions of this chapter have been fully complied with for each and every bovine animal added to his herd.

(b) Unless and until the premises are maintained in a sanitary condition which is satisfactory to the department or the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10070.

The pedigree of any purebred bovine animal shall be proved by a certificate of registry from the herd books where the animal is registered. The registration papers of any purebred bovine animal which is slaughtered because of tuberculosis and for which indemnity is paid shall be marked “canceled” by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10071.

Each claim against the state for payment for the slaughter of any reacting bovine shall be presented to the State Controller and paid out of appropriations or funds available for that purpose in accordance with law. Every claim shall be paid within 60 days after the date of presentation if the claimant is entitled to payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Tuberculosis-Exposed Cattle [10100. - 10103.]

10100.

The State Veterinarian may impose a quarantine pursuant to Section 9562 when it has been determined that any bovine animal has been exposed to tuberculosis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 50.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10101.

The State Veterinarian may impose tuberculosis testing requirements for tuberculosis-exposed cattle.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 52.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

Indemnity for reacting tuberculosis-exposed cattle may be available and shall be in accordance with the provision stated in Article 7 (commencing with Section 10061) of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 54.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

The State Veterinarian may issue a special permit for the movement of tuberculosis-exposed cattle to any of the following:

(a) An establishment that is operating under state, state approved, or federal meat inspection, or a public stockyards designated by the department to handle reactors and tuberculosis-exposed cattle for slaughter.

(b) Premises where tuberculosis-exposed cattle are kept.

(c) Premises where no spread of tuberculosis to other cattle could occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 55.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Confinement of Cattle Subject to Examination [10151. - 10152.]

10151.

If the owner or any person that is in charge of cattle, after 10 days’ written notice, refuses properly to confine in corrals or stanchions any cattle that are subject to examination, tuberculosis testing, identification, or slaughter, the department shall be entitled to reimbursement from the owner for necessary costs incurred to properly examine, tuberculosis test, identify, or slaughter the cattle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 246, Sec. 59.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10152.

Any expense which is incurred by the department pursuant to Section 10151 is a lien upon the cattle. Unless the amount of the lien is paid within 10 days after written notice of the amount of the lien is given by the department to the owner or person that is in possession of the cattle, the lien shall be enforced pursuant to Section 3052 of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Bovine Brucellosis [10301. - 10496.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10301. - 10311.]

10301.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10302.

“Accredited veterinarian” means a veterinarian who is so designated by the United States Department of Agriculture and the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10303.

“Bovine animals” means neat cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10304.

“Brucellosis” means the disease of cattle which is caused by Brucella microorganisms.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10305.

“Brucellosis control area,” means any area that has been so established by the department in order to qualify and maintain such area in accordance with certification standards of the bovine brucellosis eradication uniform methods and rules adopted by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10306.

“Cattle” means neat cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10307.

“Official veterinarian” means a veterinarian who is in the employ of the United States Department of Agriculture or the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10308.

“Premises” means any place where cattle have been or are kept.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.

“Reactor” or “reacting bovine animal” means any bovine animal that reacts positively to a test for brucellosis which is approved by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10310.

“Vaccinate” or “vaccination” means the use of vaccine in cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10311.

“Vaccine” means any vaccine which is produced by a laboratory which is licensed by the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture and recognized by the department for use in preventing or treating brucellosis in cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [10321. - 10327.]

10321.

The department may enter into any cooperative arrangement with the United States Department of Agriculture to undertake brucellosis control pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10322.

To carry out the provisions of this chapter, any duly authorized representative of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture, may enter upon any premises except dwelling houses. No person shall interfere with the representative while he is enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10323.

The department may use the services of official veterinarians or contract with accredited veterinarians to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10324.

The director may make such regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry this chapter into effect. He may require such reports and records as are necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10325.

Every accredited veterinarian who is conducting work pursuant to this chapter shall submit reports to the department on forms that are furnished for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10326.

In addition to any other authority in this part that is available to the director for the purpose of preventing the spread of any disease of livestock, the director may adopt regulations to prevent the spread within this state of bovine brucellosis through limitations on movement of bovine animals or through such tests or vaccinations or other means as he may find and determine to be necessary. If he finds and determines that similar regulations are necessary interstate, he shall notify the Governor in order that the procedure which is set forth in Section 9570 may be followed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10327.

To accomplish the purpose of this chapter and to prevent outbreaks of brucellosis, the director shall by regulation establish conditions for the movement of female dairy cattle, such as evidence of calfhood vaccination or other appropriate recognized tests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 802.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Vaccines [10341. - 10342.]

10341.

Any vaccine which is used pursuant to this chapter shall be procured by the department from a laboratory which is licensed by the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture. The vaccine, after purchase directly from the laboratory, shall be distributed by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10342.

It is unlawful for any person, except a federal, state, county, or municipal officer or employee, in his official capacity, or an accredited veterinarian, to buy, possess or use a vaccine or antigen which contains brucella micro-organisms, except pursuant to the regulations of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Vaccinations [10351. - 10359.]

10351.

All female dairy calves shall be vaccinated by an official veterinarian or an accredited veterinarian, who is authorized by the department, at such ages as are designated by the department. Male dairy calves and beef calves may, at the option of the owner, be vaccinated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10352.

Each calf which is vaccinated pursuant to this chapter shall have an official tattoo placed in the right ear by the veterinarian who performs the service that shows the period within which the animal was vaccinated, or such other evidence of vaccination or identification as the department may by regulation specify.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

10353.

The owner of any calf which is to be vaccinated pursuant to this chapter shall, upon request of the department, provide the necessary facilities and assistance for such vaccination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10354.

If the owner or any person that is in charge of any dairy calf, after 10 days’ written notice by the department, refuses properly to confine in a corral or stanchions, any calf which is required to be vaccinated and identified pursuant to this chapter, the department may in such case incur such expense as is necessary to properly vaccinate and identify the calf.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10355.

Any expense which is incurred by the department pursuant to Section 10354 is a lien upon the calf which is vaccinated and identified. Unless the amount of the lien is paid within 10 days after written notice of the amount of the lien is given by the department to the owner or person that is in possession of the calf, the lien shall be enforced pursuant to Section 3052 of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10356.

The vaccination of any bovine animal pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be by either an official veterinarian or an accredited veterinarian, who is authorized by the department. The director may charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of any vaccination performed by an official veterinarian other than the cost of the vaccine.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 802.)
-------------------------------------------

10357.

It is unlawful for any person to refuse to submit a dairy calf which is required to be vaccinated and identified pursuant to this chapter to such vaccination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10358.

It is unlawful for any person to remove any official mark which is required by this chapter, or to imitate or simulate such official mark.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10359.

It is unlawful for any person, except a federal, state, county, or municipal officer or employee, in his official capacity, or an accredited veterinarian, to buy, possess, or use any device which is designed to produce a mark, stamp, or tattoo that simulates in design the official tattoo, tag, or mark that is adopted by the department and the United States Department of Agriculture for identifying cattle which are officially vaccinated against brucellosis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Brucellosis Control Areas [10381. - 10387.]

10381.

The department may, after hearing, establish and maintain brucellosis control areas within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10382.

The department shall examine and test such cattle for brucellosis in any brucellosis control area as the director may specify, as often as may be deemed necessary to qualify and maintain such area within the standards of certification which are adopted by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.

All owners of cattle which are subject to examination and testing for brucellosis within a brucellosis control area shall, upon request of the department, provide the necessary facilities for collecting such samples of blood or milk as may be deemed necessary to conduct tests for brucellosis, and shall render such assistance as may be required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10384.

If any owner or person that is in charge of cattle, after 10 days’ written notice by the department, refuses properly to confine in corrals, stanchions, or chutes, any cattle within a brucellosis control area which are required to be tested and identified pursuant to this chapter, the owner is guilty of a misdemeanor and the department may in such case incur such expense as is necessary to properly confine and identify the cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10385.

Any expense which is incurred by the department pursuant to Section 10384 is a lien upon the cattle which are tested and identified. Unless the amount of the lien is paid within 10 days after written notice of the amount of the lien has been given by the department to the owner or person that is in possession of the cattle, the lien shall be enforced pursuant to Section 3052 of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10386.

The director shall, by regulation, designate the conditions under which cattle may be moved into a brucellosis control area.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10387.

It is unlawful for any person to refuse to submit any cattle which are required to be tested pursuant to this chapter, for the collection of milk or blood samples, or to refuse to submit any milk samples which are necessary for the testing of cattle for brucellosis pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Slaughter of Reacting Bovine Animals [10401. - 10407.]

10401.

Any bovine animal in a brucellosis control area that reacts positively to a test for brucellosis shall immediately be identified pursuant to the regulations of the secretary. The animal shall be slaughtered within 30 days in accordance with the regulations of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 653, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.

The value of an animal which is slaughtered shall be determined by appraisement by a representative of the department or a representative of the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, and by the owner or his agent. If such persons do not agree on the valuation of the animal, the animal shall be appraised by the chief appraiser of the department or his representative. In either event, the value which is determined is final.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10403.

Within 30 days after the appraisal of the animal, it shall be slaughtered under the supervision of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10404.

Where it is necessary to prevent the spread within this state of bovine brucellosis, the director may provide for the slaughter of animals.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10405.

If an animal is slaughtered pursuant to this article, and indemnity funds are available, the owner of the animal may receive part or all of the following:

(a) The proceeds of the sale of the salvage of the animal.
